Hawaii statutes.
§350B-6 Hawaii children's trust fund
advisory committee. (a) There shall be an advisory committee of the
Hawaii children's trust fund coalition. The advisory committee shall provide
leadership for the coalition. Members of the advisory committee shall be
initially selected prior to December 1, 1993.

(b) The advisory committee shall perform the
following functions:

(1) Promote statewide planning and strategies for
strengthening families with the intent of preventing child abuse and neglect;

(2) Establish criteria and guidelines for grantmaking
for the board;

(3) Publicize the fund and solicit moneys from public
and private sources, in collaboration with the board;

(4) Advise the department of health on matters
involving the prevention of child abuse and neglect; and

(5) Facilitate the exchange of information between
groups concerned with families and children.

(c) The advisory committee shall include
private and public members. Public sector representation shall include the
department of health, department of human services, department of education,
office of youth services, and the judiciary. The coalition shall elect the
private sector representatives, whose membership shall equal one more than the
number of public sector representatives.

(d) Each member of the advisory committee
shall have one vote, except that the representative of the department of health
shall not vote on matters relating to advising the department of health. The
advisory committee shall elect its officers. [L 1993, c 336, pt of §2;
am L 1996, c 298, §5]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next